test/src/morphology/V-hiibwlwma56_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `hiibõlõma: # Verb (56) `hiibõlõma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `hiibõlõma+V+Inf/mA: `hiibõlõma
     `hiibõlõma+V+Inf: hiibõldaq
     `hiibõlõma+V+ActPrtPrc: `hiibõlõ
     `hiibõlõma+V+PssPrtPrc: hiibõld
     `hiibõlõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: `hiibõlõ
     `hiibõlõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: `hiibõlõs
     `hiibõlõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: `hiibõli
     `hiibõlõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: hiibõï
